Florida, session 2026, HB535.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section
99.061, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
99.061 Method of qualifying for nomination or election to
federal, state, county, or district office.—
(7)(a) In order for a candidate to be qualified, the
following items must be received by the filing officer by the
end of the qualifying period:
1. A properly executed check drawn upon the candidate's
campaign account payable to the person or entity as prescribed
by the filing officer in an amount not less than the fee
required by s. 99.092, unless the candidate obtained the
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 535 2026
required number of signatures on petitions pursuant to s.
99.095. The filing fee for a special district candidate is not
required to be drawn upon the candidate's campaign account. If a
candidate's check is returned by the bank for any reason, the
filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the
candidate shall have until the end of qualifying to pay the fee
with a cashier's check purchased from funds of the campaign
account. Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph
shall disqualify the candidate.
2. The candidate's oath required by s. 99.021, which must
contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the
ballot; the office sought, including the district or group
number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, which
must be verified under oath or affirmation pursuant to s.
92.525(1)(a).
3. If the office sought is partisan, the written statement
of political party affiliation required by s. 99.021(1)(b); or
if the candidate is running without party affiliation for a
partisan office, the written statement required by s.
99.021(1)(c).
4. The completed form for the appointment of campaign
treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by
s. 106.021.
5. The full and public disclosure or statement of
financial interests required by subsection (5). A public officer
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 535 2026
who has filed the full and public disclosure or statement of
financial interests with the Commission on Ethics before
qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure or a
verification or receipt of electronic filing as provided in
subsection (5) at the time of qualifying.
6. If the candidate is a citizen of another country in
addition to being a citizen of the United States, a statement
disclosing any other country the candidate is also a citizen of.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
105.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
105.031 Qualification; filing fee; candidate's oath; items
required to be filed.—
(5) ITEMS REQUIRED TO BE FILED.—
(a) In order for a candidate for judicial office or the
office of school board member to be qualified, the following
items must be received by the filing officer by the end of the
qualifying period:
1. Except for candidates for retention to judicial office,
a properly executed check drawn upon the candidate's campaign
account in an amount not less than the fee required by
subsection (3) or, in lieu thereof, the copy of the notice of
obtaining ballot position pursuant to s. 105.035. If a
candidate's check is returned by the bank for any reason, the
filing officer shall immediately notify the candidate and the
candidate shall, the end of qualifying notwithstanding, have 48
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 535 2026
hours from the time such notification is received, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to pay the fee with a
cashier's check purchased from funds of the campaign account.
Failure to pay the fee as provided in this subparagraph shall
disqualify the candidate.
2. The candidate's oath required by subsection (4), which
must contain the name of the candidate as it is to appear on the
ballot; the office sought, including the district or group
number if applicable; and the signature of the candidate, duly
acknowledged.
3. The loyalty oath required by s. 876.05, signed by the
candidate and duly acknowledged.
4. The completed form for the appointment of campaign
treasurer and designation of campaign depository, as required by
s. 106.021. In addition, each candidate for judicial office,
including an incumbent judge, shall file a statement with the
qualifying officer, within 10 days after filing the appointment
of campaign treasurer and designation of campaign depository,
stating that the candidate has read and understands the
requirements of the Florida Code of Judicial Conduct. Such
statement shall be in substantially the following form:

Statement of Candidate for Judicial Office

100 I, ...(name of candidate)..., a judicial candidate, have
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 535 2026
101 received, read, and understand the requirements of the Florida
102 Code of Judicial Conduct.
103 ...(Signature of candidate)...
104 ...(Date)...
105
106 5. The full and public disclosure of financial interests
107 required by s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution or the
108 statement of financial interests required by s. 112.3145,
109 whichever is applicable. A public officer who has filed the full
110 and public disclosure or statement of financial interests with
111 the Commission on Ethics or the supervisor of elections prior to
112 qualifying for office may file a copy of that disclosure at the
113 time of qualifying.
114 6. If the candidate is a citizen of another country in
115 addition to being a citizen of the United States, a statement
116 disclosing any other country the candidate is also a citizen of.
117 Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendments
118 made by this act to sections 99.061 and 105.031, Florida
119 Statutes, in references thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1)
120 of section 99.012, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
121 99.012 Restrictions on individuals qualifying for public
122 office.—
123 (1) As used in this section:
124 (b) "Qualify" means to fulfill the requirements set forth
125 in s. 99.061(7)(a) or s. 105.031(5)(a).
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 535 2026
126 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb535-00